Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-299
Code, how construed.

Nothing in the Nebraska Juvenile Code shall be construed to repeal any portion of the act to aid the youth rehabilitation and treatment centers for juveniles.

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 55;

Laws 1985, LB 447, § 30;

Laws 1994, LB 988, § 23.

Youth rehabilitation and treatment centers, see section 43-407.